Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-204
Drains or ditches; petition for construction or maintenance; bond for costs and expenses.

Any person or persons desiring the construction of any drain or drains, ditch or ditches, or the repair and maintenance of the same, may file a petition with the county board, accompanied with a good and sufficient bond, to be approved by such board, conditioned to pay all costs and expenses of a surveyor or engineer in surveying the proposed ditch or drain and the land affected thereby as hereinafter provided, in case such ditch or drain shall not be deemed necessary for the public welfare, or for agricultural or sanitary purposes, by said board of drainage supervisors.

Laws 1911, c. 142, § 4, p. 467;

R.S.1913, § 1774;

C.S.1922, § 1721;

C.S.1929, § 31-304;

R.S.1943, § 31-204.